Utah statutes.
75-5a-103.   Scope and jurisdiction.

(1) (a)  This part applies to a transfer that refers to this part in the designation under Subsection 75-5a-110(1) by which the transfer is made if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of this state, or the custodial property is located in this state.

(b)  The custodianship created remains subject to this part despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor, or the custodian, or the removal of custodial property from this state.

(2)  A person designated as custodian under this part is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state regarding any matter relating to the custodianship.

(3)  A transfer that purports to be made and is valid under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, or a substantially similar act of another state is governed by the laws of the designated state and may be executed and is enforceable in this state if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of the designated state, or the custodial property is located in the designated state.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1990 General Session

